Alaska statutes. Title 36. Public Contracts.
Chapter 95. General Provisions.

Sec. 36.95.010.
Definitions.

In this title, unless the context requires otherwise,

“contractor” means the contractor including subcontractors performing work necessary to facilitate public construction;

“laborer, mechanic, or field surveyor” means a person who engages in work that is basically physical or unskilled in nature; or who engages in work, requiring the use of tools or machines, that basically consists of the shaping and working of materials into some type of structure, machine, or other object; or who engages in outdoor tasks related to the operation of findings and delineating contour, dimensions, position, topography, as of any part of the earth’s surface, by preparation of measured plan or description of any area or other portion of country or of road or line through any area or other portion of country;

“public construction” or “public works” means the on-site field surveying, erection, rehabilitation, alteration, extension or repair, including painting or redecorating of buildings, highways, or other improvements to real property under contract for the state, a political subdivision of the state, or a regional school board;

“resident” means a person who establishes residency under AS

01.10.055

;

“retainage” means money withheld from a contractor until completion of a contract or satisfaction of other contingency as evidenced by approval of the applicable pay estimate;

“state or a political subdivision of the state” means any state department, state agency, state university, borough, city, village, school district or other state subdivision;

“wages” includes fringe benefits.

History.

(§ 16 ch 142 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 89 SLA 1976; am § 16 ch 147 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 85 SLA 1982; am § 92 ch 6 SLA 1984; am §§ 6, 11 ch 33 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1986 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Administrative Code. —

For employment preference, see 8 AAC 30, art. 3.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Alaska State Housing Authority is a state agency within the definition of AS

36.95.010

(6).
May 28, 1974 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Little Davis-Bacon Act applies to a hotel building constructed by “Inn-Vestments Associates of Alaska,” a partnership in which the Alaska Railroad Corporation holds a 40% interest. Jan. 1, 1993 Op. Att’y Gen.